Hawaii statutes.
[§466-43] Oversight of peer reviewers for a
Hawaii supplemental peer review. (a) A peer reviewer for a Hawaii
supplement to the peer review report under section 466-36 shall be a person
who:

(1) Holds a permit to practice public accountancy
under section 466-7; and

(2) Is not affiliated with the firm being reviewed.

(b) The board shall retain oversight of the
peer reviewers for a Hawaii supplement to the peer review report by monitoring
the peer reviewers to ensure that the peer reviewers are in compliance with
subsection (a) and that peer reviews are conducted in accordance with the
standards established under section 466-36.

(c) Information concerning any peer reviewer
that is obtained during the board's peer review oversight activities shall be confidential
as required by section 466-32.

(d) The board shall annually assess the
qualifications of all peer reviewers for a Hawaii supplement to the peer review
report based on a random selection of each reviewer's published Hawaii
supplement to the peer review reports and shall determine whether the published
reports comply with subsection (b). The board may suspend a person from being
a peer reviewer for a Hawaii supplement to the peer review report for a period
not to exceed one year for failure to comply with subsection (b).

(e) A peer reviewer suspended under subsection
(d) may appeal the suspension to the board at a public hearing that shall be an
action or proceeding subject to discovery under the provisions of section
466-32(c). [L 2012, c 324, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next